California, session 20252026, SB695.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) California’s aging infrastructure is increasingly vulnerable to the impacts of climate-related disasters, including increased flooding, wildfires, and earthquakes, as many critical systems, built decades ago, are not adequately designed to withstand these extreme events.(2) Failure to act now will result in significantly greater state costs to repair, rebuild, and replace failing infrastructure. Delays will also contribute to disruptions to public services, economic activity, and transportation safety.(3) Proactive investment in resilient infrastructure today aligns with California’s commitment to sustainability, climate adaptation, and long-term economic growth and stability.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to promote infrastructure projects of statewide and regional significance that will enhance resilience to climate change, reduce disaster recovery costs, and ensure continued public safety and economic vitality.SEC. 2. Section 14053 is added to the Government Code, immediately following Section 14052, to read:14053. (a) For purposes of this section, “project of statewide and regional significance” means a high-priority highway project on the state highway system that would benefit two or more counties and that satisfies the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2).(1) Meets one or both of the following:(A) The project would improve public safety on a highway that serves as a major corridor for the movement of goods and people.(B) The project would contribute to the state’s economy by supporting key transportation routes that facilitate commerce, trade, and job growth.(2) Meets one or both of the following:(A) The project would enhance climate resilience by mitigating climate-related impacts on state highways, thereby reducing long-term infrastructure repair or replacement costs.(B) The project would address a vulnerability to a natural disaster, including, but not limited to, an earthquake, mudslide, wildfire, or another extreme climate event.(b) (1) On or before July 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the department, in consultation with the commission and the Transportation Agency, shall create a prioritized list of projects of statewide and regional significance to better prepare the state for extreme weather-related events. Priority shall be given to projects that advance the following cobenefits, with greater priority given to projects that include more than one of the following cobenefits:(A) Enhanced safety. (B) Efficient goods movement along trade corridors.(C) Climate resiliency, including, but not limited to, water storage, access to safe drinking water, and flood mitigation.(D) Improvement to electric transmission infrastructure for electrical grid reliability.(2) The list described in paragraph (1) shall include only a project of statewide and regional significance in the project approval and environmental documentation stage or the planning, environmental, and design stage, or further along.(c) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5, on or before January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the department shall submit to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795, a report containing the prioritized list described in subdivision (b).